California statutes. Penal Code
(h) The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited.

(i) Upon receipt of a report submitted pursuant to this section and any required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in
 the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 10.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27922.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to a person who takes possession of a firearm and subsequently delivers that firearm to a law enforcement agency if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person found the firearm or took the firearm from a person who was committing a crime against the person who took the firearm.

(2) The person taking possession of that firearm subsequently delivers the firearm to a law enforcement agency.

(3) The person gives prior notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the
 firearm to the law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(b) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 27920, any firearms that are delivered to a law enforcement agency pursuant to this section that are not subject to the applicable provisions of Sections 18000, 18005, or 34000, shall, if the person has requested the firearm and is eligible to receive it, be returned to that person in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 9.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27925.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to a person who takes possession of a firearm by operation of law in a representative capacity who subsequently transfers ownership of the firearm to himself or herself in an individual capacity.

(b) Until January 1, 2015, in the case of a handgun, the individual shall obtain a handgun safety certificate prior to transferring ownership to himself or herself, or taking possession of a handgun in an individual capacity. Beginning January 1, 2015, the individual shall obtain a firearm safety certificate prior to transferring ownership to himself or herself, or taking possession of a firearm in an individual capacity, except that in the case of a handgun,
 an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 10.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

27930.

Section 27545 does not apply to deliveries, transfers, or returns of firearms made pursuant to any of the following:

(a) Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2.

(c) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11.

(d) Sections 34005 and 34010.

(e) Section 29810.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 10.2.)
-------------------------------------------

27935.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms to a wholesaler as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business by a manufacturer or importer licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, or by another wholesaler, if the sale, delivery, or transfer is made in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27937.

Section 27545 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms made pursuant to Section 26556.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 25.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27940.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm regulated pursuant to any of the following statutes, if the sale, delivery, or transfer of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of the statute:

(a) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, relating to destructive devices and explosives.

(b) Section 24410, relating to cane guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to cane guns.

(c) Section 24510, relating to firearms that are not immediately
 recognizable as firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms.

(d) Sections 24610 and 24680, relating to undetectable firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to undetectable firearms.

(e) Section 24710, relating to wallet guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to wallet guns.

(f) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10, relating to assault weapons.

(g) Section 31500, relating to unconventional pistols, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to
 unconventional pistols.

(h) Sections 33215 to 33225, inclusive, relating to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns.

(i) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10, relating to machineguns.

(j) Section 33600, relating to zip guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to zip guns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27945.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm to a minor in compliance with the applicable exemptions set forth in Section 27505.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 11.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27950.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm, other than a handgun, to a licensed hunter for use by that hunter for a period of time not to exceed the duration of the hunting season for which the firearm is to be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27955.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The loan is infrequent, as defined in Section 16730.

(b) The firearm is unloaded.

(c) The loan is made by a person who is neither a dealer nor a federal firearms licensee pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(d) The loan is made to a person 18 years of age or older.

(e) The loan is for use solely as
 a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27960.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a person who is not a dealer but is a federal firearms licensee pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned
 for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(b) The person loaning the firearm pursuant to this section shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27963.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms between or to manufacturers of ammunition licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto where those firearms are to be used in the course and scope of the licensee’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 12.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27966.

If all of the following requirements are satisfied, Section 27545 shall not apply to the sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm:

(a) The firearm is not a handgun.

(b) The firearm is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(c) The person receiving the firearm has a current certificate of eligibility issued pursuant to Section 26710.

(d) The person receiving the firearm is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 of Title 18 of the United States Code and the
 regulations issued thereto.

(e) Within 30 days after taking possession of the firearm, the person to whom it is transferred shall submit to the Department of Justice, run up in a form and manner prescribed by the department, a report that includes information concerning the individual taking possession of the firearm, how title was obtained and from whom, and a description of the firearm in question. The department shall provide the report form required by this section. The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise
 prohibited.

(f) Furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the form described in this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(g) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the report described in this section and an additional fee for each additional firearm. This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the report submitted pursuant to this section. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.

(h) The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or
 machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited.

(i) Upon receipt of a report submitted pursuant to this section and any required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 11.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27970.

Section 27545 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if the loan of the firearm is to a person enrolled in the course of basic training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or any other course certified by the commission, for purposes of participation in the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   (AB 693)   Effective October 14, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Report to Department of Justice [28000. - 28000.]

28000.

(a) A person who is exempt from Section 27545 or is otherwise not required by law to report the acquisition or ownership of a firearm may submit that information to the Department of Justice in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(b) The form described in subdivision (a) shall include, without limitation, all of the following information:

(1) The name, gender, date and place of birth, address, and telephone number of the applicant.

(2) The country of citizenship of the applicant and, if not a citizen of the United States, proof of lawful presence including a permanent resident number or Arrival/Departure Record card (I-94) number.

(3) The make, model, caliber, barrel length, type, country of origin, and serial number of the firearm, or, if the firearm does not have a serial number, the identification number, or identification mark assigned to it.

(4) The applicant’s valid California driver’s license number or valid California identification card number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, or a copy of the applicant’s military identification with orders indicating that the individual is stationed in California.

(5) The signature of the applicant and the date of such signature.

(c) Furnishing a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information required to be provided for the form described in subdivision (b) is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(d) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the form described in subdivision (a) and an additional fee for each additional firearm.
 This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the form submitted
 pursuant to this section. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.

(e) Upon receipt of a completed application submitted pursuant to this section and any required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well
 as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(f) (1) A person not otherwise required to report the
 destruction, disposal, dispossession, relinquishment, or transfer of a firearm, may report the destruction, disposal, dispossession, relinquishment, or transfer of that firearm to the department, in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(2) A person who moves out of this state with a firearm and is no longer a resident of this state may report their move to the department,
 in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(g) The department may request photographs of the firearms reported pursuant to this section to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited.

(h) The department may request documentation, which would provide proof a firearm has been transferred, destroyed, disposed of, or permanently removed from this state. Documentation may include copies of receipts, forms, government-issued identification cards, and photographs to determine if the firearm is no longer possessed by the reporting party, or has been removed from this state. The department may reject the report if the department determines the documentation provided is insufficient to prove transfer,
 destruction, dispossession, or removal from this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 12.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. Registration and Assignment of Firearms by Private Patrol Operators [28010. - 28024.]

28010.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that current practices and statutes authorize the purchase, registration, and ownership of firearms by an individual, but not by a business entity.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to allow business ownership and registration of firearms in the case of licensed Private Patrol Operators (PPOs) who are actively providing armed private contract security services. It is further the intent of the Legislature to establish procedures whereby a PPO may assign firearms it owns to its employees who are licensed to carry firearms and that assignment of a firearm by a PPO to that employee would not constitute a
 loan, sale, or transfer of a firearm.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to require notification of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services any time a security guard is listed on the Prohibited Armed Persons File so that the bureau may proceed with appropriate action regarding the licensing of the employee.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services within the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Justice.

(3) “Director” means the Director of the
 Department of Consumer Affairs.

(4) “Private patrol operator” or “PPO” means a private patrol operator licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code whose license is not suspended, revoked, expired, inactive, delinquent, or canceled.

(5) “Security guard” means a security guard registered pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code whose registration is not suspended, revoked, expired, inactive, delinquent, or
 canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28012.

(a) A PPO may be the registered owner of a firearm if the PPO is registered with the department pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(b) The department shall modify the department’s Dealers’ Record of Sale (DROS) form to allow a PPO to be listed as the purchaser and registered owner of a firearm. The form shall also require the PPO to identify its type of business formation and to include any tax identification number or other identifying number of the PPO that may be required by the department.

(c) (1) The department shall modify the department’s DROS form to require
 the PPO to designate a “firearms custodian” for the firearm owned by the PPO that is listed in the DROS. A firearms custodian shall possess a valid firearms qualification permit issued by the bureau. A firearms custodian is responsible for the tracking, safekeeping, and inventory of those firearms of the PPO for which the custodian is designated, and shall serve as a point of contact for the department regarding the firearms for which the custodian is designated.

(2) If a firearms custodian is no longer employed by the PPO in that capacity, or otherwise becomes ineligible to be the firearms custodian, the PPO shall notify the department of that fact within seven days in a manner prescribed by the department, and the PPO shall notify the department of the designated replacement firearms custodian within 20 days of the original
 notice.

(d) A security guard shall possess a valid firearm qualification permit issued by the bureau prior to receiving a firearm from a PPO pursuant to a Certificate of Assignment (COA). A firearm shall be assigned by a PPO to a security guard who is employed to work for the PPO only when that employment requires the security guard to be armed.

(e) (1) (A) The department shall prescribe a “Certificate of Assignment” or “COA.” The COA may include fields that are in the DROS form, and shall be used to identify the employee of the PPO who has been assigned a PPO-owned firearm by the PPO pursuant to this chapter.

(B) The COA shall also be used to identify an employee of the PPO
 who will use his or her own firearm in the course of his or her duties as a security guard. The COA shall not require specific information regarding an employee-owned firearm.

(2) A PPO shall register a PPO-owned firearm acquired prior to July 1, 2016, as a PPO-owned firearm in a manner prescribed by the department prior to filing a COA for that firearm.

(3) Upon the PPO assigning a firearm to an employee who is a security guard, the PPO shall complete the COA and file it with the department in a timely manner as prescribed by the department.

(f) The department shall cause the information contained on the COA to be entered into the Automated Firearms System in a timely manner. Upon termination of the employment assignment
 that requires the security guard to be armed and the transfer of the firearm from the security guard back to the PPO, the PPO shall complete a COA indicating that the firearm is no longer assigned to the employee and that the firearm is in the possession of the PPO and shall file the COA with the department in a timely manner, as prescribed.

(g) If a security guard becomes listed on the Prohibited Armed Persons File, the department shall immediately notify the bureau of the listing by secured electronic delivery. Upon that notification, the bureau shall take appropriate action regarding the security guard. In addition, the department shall notify the PPO, in the manner the department deems appropriate, that the PPO employee is prohibited
 from being armed. This chapter does not prohibit the department from also notifying the bureau if a security guard has been arrested and charged with an offense that, upon conviction, would constitute a basis for revocation of a firearms qualification permit or security guard registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28014.

The department shall charge a fee not to exceed the reasonable costs to the department for filing and processing a COA, and for the costs incurred in the implementation and administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, entering information obtained pursuant to this chapter into the Automated Firearms System and other databases as deemed necessary by the department. The fee shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28016.

(a) If the PPO ceases to do business, ceases to possess a valid PPO license issued by the bureau that is not suspended, revoked, expired, inactive, delinquent, or canceled, ceases as a business entity, or changes its type of business formation, the PPO shall, within 30 days and unless otherwise prohibited by law, lawfully sell or transfer all PPO-owned firearms.

(b) A PPO shall notify the department of the sale or transfer of a PPO-owned firearm within five business
 days of the transaction in a manner prescribed by the department. This subdivision shall not apply if the sale or transfer was made to or through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28018.

Notwithstanding any other law, an assignment of a firearm pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a loan, sale, or transfer of a firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28020.

(a) Within 48 hours of the PPO’s request, for any reason, or within 48 hours of separation of employment or revocation of the firearm qualification card, the security guard shall return to the PPO the firearm owned by the PPO and listed on a COA.

(b) The failure of a security guard to comply with subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor.

(c) If a security guard employed by a PPO does not comply with subdivision (a), the PPO shall notify the bureau within seven business days
 from the date that the security guard was required to return the firearm to the PPO.

(d) This chapter does not limit the right of a security guard to use, possess, or otherwise lawfully carry a firearm owned by that security guard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28022.

(a) The director, through his or her designee, may assess an administrative fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) against a PPO or a security guard for each willful violation of this chapter. All fines collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(b) An assessment imposed pursuant to this section may be appealed pursuant to Section 7581.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 28024.)
-------------------------------------------

28024.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2220)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 2016) for Chapter 4.1, commencing with Section 28010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Procedure For a Private Party Firearms Transaction [28050. - 28070.]

28050.

(a) A person shall complete any sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm through a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, in accordance with this chapter in order to comply with Section 27545.

(b) The seller or transferor or the person loaning the firearm shall deliver the firearm to the dealer who shall retain possession of that firearm.

(c) The dealer shall then deliver the firearm to the purchaser or transferee or the person being loaned the firearm, if it is not prohibited, in accordance with Section 27540.

(d) If the dealer cannot
 legally deliver the firearm to the purchaser or transferee or the person being loaned the firearm, the dealer shall forthwith, without waiting for the conclusion of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, return the firearm to the transferor or seller or the person loaning the firearm. The dealer shall not return the firearm to the seller or transferor or the person loaning the firearm when to do so would constitute a violation of Section 27500, 27505, 27515, 27520, 27525, 27530, or 27535.

(e) Until July 1, 2024, if the dealer cannot legally return the firearm to the transferor or seller or the person loaning the firearm, then the dealer shall forthwith deliver the firearm to the sheriff of the county or the chief of police or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county, who shall then
 dispose of the firearm in the manner provided by Sections 18005 and 34000.

(f) If Commencing July 1, 2024, if the dealer cannot legally return the firearm to the seller, transferor, or person loaning the firearm, then the following procedure shall apply:

(1) The seller, transferor, or person loaning the firearm may request, and the dealer shall grant, that the dealer retain possession
 of the firearm for a period of up to 45 days so that the transferor or seller or the person loaning the firearm may designate a person to take possession of that firearm in accordance with Section 27540. This 45-day period shall be in addition to the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, and any time necessary to process a transaction.

(2) If, before the end of the 45-day period, the seller, transferor, or person loaning the firearm designates a person to receive the firearm and that person completes an application to purchase, the dealer shall process the transaction in accordance with the provisions of Section 27540.

(3) If the seller, transferor, or person loaning the firearm, does not request that the firearm be held by the dealer pursuant to
 this subdivision, or the firearm cannot be delivered to the designated person, the dealer, shall forthwith deliver the firearm to the sheriff of the county or the chief of police or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county, where the dealership is located, who shall then dispose of the firearm in the manner provided by Sections 18000, 18005, and 34000.

(g) (1) If a dealer retains possession of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (f), the dealer shall within 72 hours after retaining possession of the firearm, notify the Department of Justice in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(2) If a dealer delivers possession a firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f), the dealer shall notify the
 Department of Justice within 72 hours after the delivery of the firearm in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 13.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

28055.

(a) For a sale, loan, or transfer conducted pursuant to this chapter, the purchaser or transferee or person being loaned the firearm may be required by the dealer to pay a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per firearm.

(b) For temporary storage of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 28050, the seller, transferor, or person loaning a firearm may be required by the dealer to pay a fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per firearm.

(c) No other fee may be charged by the dealer for a sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm conducted pursuant to this chapter, except for the applicable fees that may be charged pursuant to
 Sections 23690 and 28300 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200) of Chapter 6 and forwarded to the Department of Justice, and the fees set forth in Section 31650.

(d) The dealer may not charge any additional fees.

(e) Nothing in these provisions shall prevent a dealer from charging a smaller fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 14.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

28060.

The Attorney General shall adopt regulations under this chapter to do all of the following:

(a) Allow the seller or transferor or the person loaning the firearm, and the purchaser or transferee or the person being loaned the firearm, to complete a sale, loan, or transfer through a dealer, and to allow those persons and the dealer to preserve the confidentiality of those records and to comply with the requirements of this chapter and all of the following:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(2) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) of Chapter
 4.

(3) Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150) of Chapter 6.

(4) Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200) of Chapter 6.

(b) Record sufficient information for purposes of Section 11106 in the instance where a firearm is returned to a personal firearm importer because a sale or transfer of that firearm by the personal firearm importer could not be completed.

(c) Ensure that the register or record of electronic transfer shall state all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the seller or transferor of the firearm or the person loaning the firearm.

(2) Whether or not the person is a personal firearm importer.

(3) Any other information required by Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150) of Chapter 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 47.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

28065.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a dealer who does not sell, transfer, or keep an inventory of handguns is not required to process private party transfers of handguns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28070.

A violation of this chapter by a dealer is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Recordkeeping, Background Checks, and Fees Relating to Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Firearms  [28100. - 28490.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions Relating to the Register or the Record of Electronic or Telephonic Transfer  [28100. - 28110.]

28100.

(a) As required by the Department of Justice, every dealer shall keep a register or record of electronic or telephonic transfer in which shall be entered the information prescribed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150).

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following transactions:

(1) The loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8, for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(2) The delivery of
 an unloaded firearm by a dealer to a gunsmith for service or repair.

(3) Until January 1, 2014, the sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm, other than a handgun, by a dealer to another dealer, upon proof of compliance with the requirements of Section 27555.

(4) The sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm by a dealer who sells, delivers, or transfers the firearm to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(5) The sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm by a dealer to a wholesaler if that firearm is being returned to the wholesaler and is intended as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business.

(6) The sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm by a dealer to another dealer, upon proof of compliance with the requirements of Section 27555, if the firearm is intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business.

(7) Until January 1, 2014, the sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm, other than a handgun, by a dealer to themselves.

(8) The loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer who also operates a target facility which holds a business or regulatory license on the premises of the building designated in the license or whose building designated in the license is on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, to a person at that target facility or club or organization, if the firearm is
 kept at all times within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(9) The loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer to a consultant-evaluator, if the loan does not exceed 45 days from the date of delivery of the firearm by the dealer to the consultant-evaluator.

(10) The return of an unloaded firearm to the owner of that firearm by a dealer, if the owner initially delivered the firearm to the dealer for service or repair.

(11) The sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm by a dealer to a person licensed as an importer or manufacturer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(12) The delivery of an unloaded
 firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 28050.

(13) The delivery of an unloaded firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 26892.

(14) The delivery of an unloaded firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 29830.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 26.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

28105.

(a) (1) The register required by Section 28100 shall be prepared by and obtained from the State Printer.

(2) The State Printer shall furnish the register only to dealers on application, at a cost to be determined by the Department of General Services.

(3) The Department of General Services shall determine the cost for each 100 leaves in quadruplicate, one original and three duplicates for the making of carbon copies.

(4) The original and duplicate copies shall differ in color, and shall be in the form provided by this chapter.

(b) Where the electronic transfer of applicant information is used, the Department of Justice shall develop the standards for all appropriate electronic equipment and telephone numbers to effect the transfer of information to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28110.

(a) The State Printer upon issuing a register shall forward to the Department of Justice both of the following:

(1) The name and business address of the dealer.

(2) The series and sheet numbers of the register.

(b) The register shall not be transferable.

(c) If the dealer moves the business to a different location, the dealer shall notify the department of that fact in writing within 48 hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form of the Register or the Record of Electronic Transfer  [28150. - 28180.]

28150.

As used in this article, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Purchase” means the purchase, loan, or transfer of a firearm.

(b) “Purchaser” means the purchaser or transferee of a firearm or the person being loaned a firearm.

(c) “Sale” means the sale, loan, or transfer of a firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28155.

The Department of Justice shall prescribe the form of the register and the record of electronic transfer pursuant to Section 28105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28160.
